Connecticut, session 2026, HB05359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47a-4c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and
applicable to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after October 1,
2026):
For any lease or rental agreement executed on or after October 1,
2013, no landlord of residential real property shall require electronic
funds transfer as the exclusive form of payment of rent or a security
deposit. For purposes of this section, "electronic funds transfer" means
any transfer of funds that is initiated through an electronic terminal,
telephone or computer or magnetic tape so as to order, instruct or
authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account but shall
not include any transfer originated by check, draft or similar paper
instrument. For any lease or rental agreement entered into or renewed
on or after October 1, 2026, every landlord of residential real property
sHB5359 / File No. 143 1

sHB5359 File No. 143
shall provide at least one method for the payment of rent that can be
made by the tenant at no additional fee.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 47a-4 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026, and applicable to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after
October 1, 2026):
(a) A rental agreement shall not provide that the tenant: (1) Agrees to
waive or forfeit rights or remedies under this chapter and sections 47a-
21, 47a-23 to 47a-23b, inclusive, 47a-26 to 47a-26g, inclusive, 47a-35 to
47a-35b, inclusive, 47a-41a, 47a-43 and 47a-46, or under any section of
the general statutes or any municipal ordinance unless such section or
ordinance expressly states that such rights may be waived; (2)
authorizes the landlord to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the
rental agreement; (3) agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any
liability of the landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord
for that liability or the costs connected therewith; (4) agrees to waive his
right to the interest on the security deposit pursuant to section 47a-21;
(5) agrees to permit the landlord to dispossess him without resort to
court order; (6) consents to the distraint of his property for rent; (7)
agrees to pay the landlord's attorney's fees in excess of fifteen per cent
of any judgment against the tenant in any action in which money
damages are awarded; (8) agrees to pay a late charge prior to the
expiration of the grace period set forth in section 47a-15a or to pay rent
in a reduced amount if such rent is paid on or prior to the expiration of
such grace period; (9) agrees to pay a late charge on rent payments made
subsequent to such grace period in an amount exceeding the amounts
set forth in section 47a-15a; [or] (10) agrees to pay a heat or utilities
surcharge if heat or utilities is included in the rental agreement; (11)
agrees to pay an increased rental charge or other specific payment
amount for a time period after the expiration of the rental agreement; or
(12) for a tenant who is paying a reduced rental rate, agrees to pay a
higher rent upon breach of the rental agreement.
Sec. 3. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 47a-7d of the 2026
sHB5359 / File No. 143 2

sHB5359 File No. 143
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage and applicable to rental
agreements entered into or renewed on or after October 1, 2026):
(c) Not later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Housing shall
publish, on the department's Internet web site, a standardized rental
terms summary form, and, not later than July 1, 2026, the department
shall publish, on its Internet web site, an updated version of such form
consistent with the provisions of this subsection. Such form shall clearly
summarize the key terms of a written rental agreement, including, but
not limited to, the term of the rental agreement, the name of the
landlord, the point of contact for property management purposes, the
name of each tenant and the total periodic rent determined in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. Such
summary form shall be published and provided in both English and
Spanish and, on and after October 1, 2026, include the amount, if any,
that the tenant shall be charged in accordance with the provisions of
section 47a-15a if the rent is not paid within the grace period provided
in said section.
(d) On and after April 1, 2026, no landlord shall provide a written
rental agreement to any tenant unless such rental agreement includes,
as the first page of such rental agreement, a completed copy of the
standardized rental terms summary form published pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section. On and after October 1, 2026, any such
written rental agreement entered into or renewed on or after October 1,
2026 shall include the updated version of such summary form.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 47a-4c
applicable to rental
agreements entered into or
renewed on or after
October 1, 2026
sHB5359 / File No. 143 3

sHB5359 File No. 143
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026, and 47a-4(a)
applicable to rental
agreements entered into or
renewed on or after
October 1, 2026
Sec. 3 from passage and 47a-7d(c) and (d)
applicable to rental
agreements entered into or
renewed on or after
October 1, 2026
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The effective date of Section 2 was changed to mirror Sections 1 and 3
for consistency, Section 2(a)(11) was reworded for clarity and
consistency and in Section 3, Subsec. (d) was added to include a
provision referring to the updated summary form to conform with the
changes being made in Subsec. (c).
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5359 / File No. 143 4

sHB5359 File No. 143
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes various changes to allowable provisions in
rental agreements and requires the Department of Housing (DOH) to
update a form, is not anticipated to result in a fiscal impact. The state is
not a direct residential landlord, and DOH has the expertise to meet the
requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5359 / File No. 143 5

sHB5359 File No. 143
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5359
AN ACT CONCERNING PROVISIONS IN RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
AGREEMENTS.